Illinois, session 104th, SB1484.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Facilitating Voting By All Eligible Citizens Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares:8    (1) Section 4 of Article III of the Illinois Constitution 9provides that "The General Assembly by law shall define 10permanent residence for voting purposes, insure secrecy of 11voting and the integrity of the election process, and 12facilitate registration and voting by all qualified persons. 13Laws governing voter registration and conduct of elections 14shall be general and uniform."15    (2) While precise data does not exist, there are likely 16fewer than 10,000,000 citizens who are eligible to vote in 17Illinois. Of those eligible voters, approximately 8,100,000 18are registered to vote and approximately 5,700,000 cast a 19ballot in the 2024 general election.20    (3) More than 24 countries, most notably Australia, treat 21voting as a civic duty, similar to jury duty. 22    (4) Illinois can lead the nation in implementing an 23American-style universal civic voting policy.   SB1484- 2 -LRB104 09443 SPS 19503 b1    Section 10. Universal civic duty to cast a ballot. 2    (a) All eligible citizens shall cast a ballot in every 3general election. An eligible citizen who casts a blank ballot 4in a general election shall satisfy the requirement of this 5subsection.6    (b) No fine, fee, or penalty shall be assessed if an 7eligible citizen does not cast a ballot in a general election.